Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2522
Liability insurance coverage.

The board may provide its representatives, its officers, and agents and employees of the joint public agency and participating public agencies, either collectively or individually, with personal liability insurance coverage insuring against any liability and claim arising by reason of any act or omission in any manner relating to the performance, attempted performance, or failure of performance of official duties as a participating public agency, representative, officer, agent, or employee and may authorize the payment of the premium, cost, and expense of insurance from the general fund of the joint public agency. The agreement may provide that such coverage be the responsibility of one or more of the participating public agencies.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 22.